Missouri, session 2026, SB1639.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 8.255, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 8.255
and 8.292, to read as follows:
8.255. 1. The director of the division of facilities
management, design and construction may authorize any agency
of the state to establish standing contracts for the purpose
of accomplishing construction, renovation, maintenance and
repair projects not exceeding [one] two hundred fifty
thousand dollars. Such contracts shall be advertised and
bid in the same manner as contracts for work which exceeds
[one] two hundred [thousand] fifty dollars, except that each
contract shall allow for multiple projects, the cost of each
of which does not exceed [one] two hundred fifty thousand
dollars. Each contract shall be of a stated duration and
shall have a stated maximum total expenditure. For job
order contracts, the total expenditure per project shall not
exceed [three] seven hundred fifty thousand dollars.
2. The director, with full documentation, shall have
the authority to authorize any agency to contract for any
design or construction, renovation, maintenance, or repair
work which in his judgment can best be procured directly by
such agency. The director shall establish, by rule, the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1639 2
procedures which the agencies must follow to procure
contracts for design, construction, renovation, maintenance
or repair work. Each agency which procures such contracts
pursuant to a delegation shall file an annual report as
required by rule. The director shall provide general
supervision over the process. The director may establish
procedures by which such contracts are to be procured,
either generally or in accordance with each authorization.
3. The director, in his sole discretion, may with full
documentation approve a recommendation from a project
designer that a material, product or system within a
specification for construction, renovation or repair work be
designated by brand, trade name or individual mark, when it
is determined to be in the best interest of the state. The
specification may include a preestablished price for
purchase of the material, product or system where required
by the director.
8.292. 1. As used in this section, "master agreement"
means a contract for architecture, engineering, or land
surveying services that will be performed on an as-needed
basis for an indefinite quantity of projects over a defined
period.
2. The division of facilities management, design and
construction may establish master agreements using a
qualification-based selection process. Master agreements
may be used for multiple projects, provided the estimated
fee for architecture, engineering, or land surveying
services for each individual project does not exceed one
hundred thousand dollars.
3. The division shall issue a request for
qualifications for all master agreements. Each request for
qualifications shall be published on the website of the

SB 1639 3
division or advertised through an electronic medium
available to the general public for a period of at least ten
days before statements of qualifications are reviewed.
4. The request for qualifications shall specify the
number of master agreements to be awarded and the basis for
establishing multiple master agreements. Multiple master
agreements may be awarded based on a set number, geographic
region, or the type of projects or services to be performed.
5. The division shall evaluate statements of
qualifications for a master agreement based on the following
criteria:
(1) The specialized experience and technical
competence of the firm with respect to the type of services
that may be required;
(2) The past record of performance of the firm with
respect to such factors as control of costs, quality of
work, and ability to meet schedules; and
(3) If applicable, the firm's proximity to and
familiarity with the area in which services are to be
performed.
6. The period for each master agreement may not exceed
two years, including all renewal periods, and the total
value of all services performed under the master agreement
may not exceed one million dollars per year.
7. A master agreement shall set forth the agreed-upon
terms and conditions and the fee schedule or hourly rate for
the specified period. The scope, schedule, and total fee
for each project performed under the master agreement shall
be established by a task order issued by the division.
✓